Washington statutes.
RCW 43.70.400

Head injury prevention—Legislative finding.

The legislature finds that head injury is a major cause of death and disability for Washington citizens. The costs of head injury treatment and rehabilitation are extensive and resultant disabilities are long and indeterminate. These costs are often borne by public programs such as medicaid. The legislature finds further that many such injuries are preventable. The legislature intends to reduce the occurrence of head injury by educating persons whose behavior may place them at risk and by regulating certain activities.

[ 1990 c 270 s 2.]